Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 10 Arkansas Local Police And Fire Retirement System
24-10-608. Death of member in paid service.

If an active member with five (5) or more years of credited paid service, including credited service for the year immediately preceding his or her death, dies in employer-paid service before retirement, the applicable benefits provided in this subsection and subsections (c)-(e) of this section shall be paid, subject to § 24-10-610.

His or her surviving spouse, who was married to the member at least one (1) year immediately preceding his or her death, shall receive an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the member had:

Retired the date of his or her death with entitlement to an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602;

Elected Option B50 survivor beneficiary annuity provided for in § 24-10-603; and

Nominated the spouse as joint beneficiary.

The spouse annuity shall not be less than twenty percent (20%) of the deceased member's final average pay at the time of death, or one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) monthly, whichever is greater.

If an active member dies in employer-paid service before retirement as a result of a personal injury or disease which the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System finds to have arisen out of and in the course of his or her actual performance of duty as an employee, the applicable benefits provided in this subsection and subsections (c)-(e) of this section shall be paid, subject to § 24-10-610.

His or her surviving spouse, who was married to the member at least one (1) year immediately preceding his or her death, shall receive an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the member had:

Retired the date of his or her death with entitlement to an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602;

Elected Option B50 survivor beneficiary annuity provided for in § 24-10-603; and

Nominated the spouse as joint beneficiary.

For the sole purpose of computing the amount of the annuity on account of any member who does not have twenty-five (25) years of credited service in force at the time of death, credited service shall be granted for the period from the date of his or her death to the date he or she would have completed twenty-five (25) years of credited service.

The spouse annuity shall not be less than twenty percent (20%) of the deceased member's final average pay at the time of death or one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) monthly, whichever is greater.

If a spouse annuity is payable as a result of a member's death while in paid service, his or her dependent children shall each receive an annuity of the greater of ten percent (10%) of the member's final average pay at the time of death or twenty-five dollars ($25.00) monthly.

However, while there are four (4) or more dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an annuity of an equal share of the greater of thirty percent (30%) of the final average pay or one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) monthly.

Upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his or her annuity shall terminate, and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children.

If no spouse annuity is payable as a result of a member's death while in paid service, his or her dependent children shall each receive an annuity of the greater of twenty percent (20%) of the member's final average pay at the time of death or twenty-five dollars ($25.00) monthly.

However, while there are three (3) or more dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an annuity of an equal share of the greater of fifty percent (50%) of the final average pay or one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) monthly.

Upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his or her annuity shall terminate, and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children.

If, at the time of the member's death while in paid service, there is neither a spouse nor a dependent child, each dependent parent shall receive an annuity of the greater of twenty percent (20%) of the final average pay or fifty dollars ($50.00) monthly, but only if the plan finds that the parent was dependent upon the member for at least fifty percent (50%) of his or her financial support at the time of death.

Annuities payable under the provisions of this section shall commence the first day of the calendar month next following the date of the member's death or a later date specified for the commencement of annuity payments.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual credited service in order to be eligible under this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; 1983, No. 654, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1995, No. 1031, § 1; 2013, No. 1065, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (g).

24-10-609. Death of member in volunteer service.

If an active member who has accrued five (5) or more years of credited service, including credited service for the year immediately preceding his or her death, or who has attained his or her normal retirement age dies in employer volunteer service before retirement, the applicable benefits provided in this subsection and subsection (c) of this section shall be paid, subject to § 24-10-610.

His or her surviving spouse, who was married to the member at least one (1) year immediately preceding his or her death, shall receive an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the member had:

Retired the date of his or her death with entitlement to an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602;

Elected Option B50 survivor beneficiary annuity provided for in § 24-10-603; and

Nominated the spouse as joint beneficiary.

If an active member dies in employer volunteer service before retirement as a result of a personal injury or disease that the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System finds to have arisen out of and in the course of his or her actual performance of duty as an employee, the applicable benefits provided in this subsection and subsection (c) of this section shall be paid, subject to § 24-10-610.

His or her surviving spouse, who was married to the member at least one (1) year immediately preceding his or her death, shall receive an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the member had:

Retired the date of his or her death with entitlement to an annuity provided for in § 24-10-602;

Elected Option B50 survivor beneficiary annuity provided for in § 24-10-603; and

Nominated the spouse as joint beneficiary.

For the sole purpose of computing the amount of the annuity on account of any member who does not have twenty-five (25) years of credited volunteer service in force at time of death, credited volunteer service shall be granted for the period from the date of his or her death to the date he or she would have completed twenty-five (25) years of credited volunteer service.

Upon a member's death while in volunteer service and in qualifying circumstances provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, his or her dependent children shall each receive an annuity of fifteen dollars ($15.00) monthly.

However, while there are three (3) or more dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an annuity of an equal share of forty dollars ($40.00) monthly.

Upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his or her annuity shall terminate, and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children.

Annuities payable under the provisions of this section shall commence the first day of the calendar month next following the date of the member's death or a later date specified for the commencement of annuity payments.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual service in order to be eligible for benefits under this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; 1983, No. 654, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1995, No. 1031, § 2; 2003, No. 477, § 1; 2013, No. 1065, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (e).

24-10-610. Limitations on death and disability annuities.

If a death annuity is payable on behalf of a member who dies in employer service before retirement, or for the portion of a disability annuity payable before a disability retirant's attainment of age fifty-five (55), the total amount of the system annuities based on paid service shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of his or her final average pay at the time of death or disability.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1993, No. 1202, § 1; 1995, No. 643, § 2; 1997, No. 765, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

24-10-611. Termination of covered employment.

A member who terminates covered employment before attaining his or her normal retirement age, for a reason other than death, early retirement, or disability retirement, shall be entitled to an annuity computed in accordance with the provisions of this section, as it provides at the time of the last termination of covered employment, subject to the member's satisfying all of the following conditions:

The member has five (5) years of credited service.

A member hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall accrue ten (10) years of actual service in order to be eligible for retirement;

The member lives to his or her annuity starting date;

The member makes proper application for retirement and payment of the annuity to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days before the date he or she attains his or her normal retirement age; and

The annuity starting date shall be the first day of the calendar month next following the later of:

The date the member attains his or her normal retirement age; and

The date the proper application is received by the system.

The monthly amount of a vested termination annuity shall be computed in the same manner as a normal annuity amount provided for in § 24-10-602, but based upon his or her credited service and final average pay at the time of termination of covered employment.

If the effective date of the annuity is at least twelve (12) full months after termination, an amount of final average pay usable for the purposes of this section shall be redetermined.

The redetermined amount shall be the amount of final average pay at the time of termination of covered employment increased by one-half (½) of any percentage increase in the inflation index for the period from three (3) months immediately preceding the termination to three (3) months immediately preceding the annuity effective date.

For an annuity with an effective date that is on or after July 1, 2019, the pay used for the annuity computation shall be the final average pay at the time of termination from paid service employment with the system.

He or she shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-10-603.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1997, No. 1136, § 3; 1999, No. 1070, § 5; 2007, No. 294, § 2; 2013, No. 40, § 12; 2013, No. 1065, § 10; 2019, No. 178, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 40 substituted “proper application” for “written application” in (a)(3) and (a)(4)(B); and substituted “not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) day” for “on or after the date that is six (6) months” in (a)(3).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1065 added the (a)(1)(A) designation and added (a)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment redesignated former (b)(3) as (b)(3)(A) and added (b)(3)(B).

24-10-612. Redetermination of benefits.

Beginning with the July 1 that is at least twelve (12) full months after the effective date of a monthly benefit, the amount of the benefit shall be redetermined effective each July 1, and the redetermined amount shall be payable for the ensuing year.

The redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by three percent (3%).

Effective July 1, 2009, there will be a one-time redetermination of benefits for paid service members who were receiving a benefit on or before June 30, 2009.

The paid service retirants will receive a benefit beginning July 1, 2009, which is the greater of:

The benefit calculated under § 24-10-602, as in effect on July 1, 2009, using the member's final average salary at retirement; or

The monthly benefit that otherwise would be paid on July 1, 2009, under this section.

The redetermination under subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) of this section is applicable to all paid service members or their beneficiaries receiving benefits under this subchapter.

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall not make any benefit payments retroactive to a date before July 1, 2009.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1995, No. 1267, § 1; 1997, No. 289, § 1; 2003, No. 475, § 1; 2009, No. 720, § 5;
2009, No. 1316, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 720 added (c).

The 2009 amendment by No. 1316 deleted the (c)(3)(A) designation; deleted “Except as provided in subdivision (c)(3)(B) of this section” in (3); and deleted (c)(3)(B).

24-10-613. Disposition of accumulated contributions.

On or after July 1, 2013, if a retirant and his or her eligible beneficiary, if any, both die before they have received in annuity payments a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions standing to the retirant's credit in the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System at the time of his or her retirement, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the total amount of annuities received by them shall be paid to the persons the retirant nominated in a manner prescribed by the system and filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

If no designated person survives the retirant and his or her beneficiary, the difference shall be paid to the estates of the survivor of the retirant and his or her beneficiary.

In the event a member ceases to be a member, other than by death, before the date he or she becomes vested to receive an annuity payable by the system, he or she shall be paid the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account upon his or her proper application filed with the board.

In the event a member dies and no annuity becomes or will become payable by the system on account of his or her death, the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time of his or her death shall be paid to the persons he or she nominated in a manner prescribed by the system and filed with the board.

If there are no designated persons surviving the member, the accumulated contributions shall be paid to his or her surviving spouse or to his or her estate, if there is no surviving spouse.

In the event a member's membership in the system terminates and no annuity becomes or will become payable on his or her account, any accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account and unclaimed by the member or his or her legal representative within three (3) years from and after the date his or her membership terminated shall be transferred to the income-expense account.

If, thereafter, proper application is made for the accumulated contributions, the board shall pay them from the income-expense account but without interest after the date payment was first due.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 1999, No. 1070, § 4; 2013, No. 40, § 13; 2013, No. 1065, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 40 substituted “in a manner prescribed by the system” for “by written designation duly executed” in (a)(1) and (c)(1); substituted “estates” for “estate” in (a)(2); and substituted “the accumulated” for “his or her accumulated” in (c)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1065 added “On or after July 1, 2013” preceding “if a retirant” and deleted “, including any interest credits” preceding “standing to the” in (a)(1).

24-10-614. Payment of reserve value.

The plan may pay the reserve value of any annuity benefit to a retirant or beneficiary when the annuity benefit payment is less than twenty dollars ($20.00) per month, except that the consent of the payee shall be required if the payment exceeds one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750).

The reserve value shall be the actuarial equivalent of the annuity otherwise payable.

Any lump-sum payment so made shall be a complete discharge of all liability under the plan with respect to the annuity.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805.

24-10-615. Suspension of payments upon request.

Notwithstanding any other provision of a plan, a person entitled to receive a plan benefit may request in a manner prescribed by the system, for personal reasons and without disclosure thereof, to suspend for any period the payment of all or any part of the benefit otherwise payable to him or her under this chapter.

Upon receipt of proper notice, the plan shall authorize the suspension, and the person shall be deemed to have forfeited all rights to the amount of benefits so suspended but shall have the right to have the full benefit otherwise payable reinstated as to future monthly payments upon proper notice to the plan to revoke the prior request for a suspension under this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805; Acts 2013, No. 40, § 14.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “in a manner prescribed by the system” for “the plan in writing” in (a); and in (b), substituted “proper notice” for “the request” near the beginning and for “written notice” near the end.

24-10-616. Subjection of benefit rights to legal process.

The right of a person to an annuity, the return of accumulated contributions, the annuity itself, any annuity option, any other right accrued or accruing under the provisions of this chapter, and all moneys belonging to a plan shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever and shall be unassignable, except as is specifically provided in this chapter. However, an employer shall have the right of setoff for any claim arising from embezzlement by, or fraud of, a member, retirant, or beneficiary.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3805.

24-10-617. Survivor health benefits.

When a municipal employee who is vested in a municipal retirement system under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, § 24-10-101 et seq., or under a local policemen's pension and relief fund, § 24-11-401 et seq., or under a firemen's relief and pension fund, § 24-11-801 et seq., is killed or dies in the course of his or her employment and is survived by a spouse, or has surviving dependents actively drawing a benefit from those municipal retirement systems, then the surviving spouse or surviving dependents may continue to participate in the municipality's healthcare plan as long as the surviving spouse or surviving dependents pay both employer and employee contributions to the healthcare plan.

However, a surviving spouse or surviving dependent may qualify to continue on the healthcare plan only so long as they remain an eligible beneficiary under the retirement system.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 695, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-10-101 to 24-10-616 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-10-618. Limitation on benefits granted by Acts 1997, No. 765.

No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-10-610 shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization. No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-10-610 shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 765, § 2.

24-10-619. Limitation on benefits granted by Acts 1997, No. 1136.

No benefit enhancement provided for by §§ 24-10-604, 24-10-605, and 24-10-611 shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization. No benefit enhancement provided for by §§ 24-10-604, 24-10-605, and 24-10-611 shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1136, § 4.

24-10-620. Limitations on benefits.

Notwithstanding any language to the contrary under this chapter, benefits attributable to employer contributions and paid under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall not exceed the limitations of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 415, as it existed on January 1, 2011, that are applicable to government retirement plans for employees of police and fire departments, including without limitation the dollar limitations in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 415(b)(1)(A), as it existed on January 1, 2011.

If the dollar amount referenced in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 415(b)(1)(A), as it existed on January 1, 2011, is increased pursuant to regulations issued under that section, the increase shall be effective as of January 1 of the calendar year for which the regulations were effective.

The annual benefits, as may be increased in subsequent years, that are paid to a retirant of the system shall not exceed the limitations under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 415(b), as it existed on January 1, 2011, applicable to the annuity effective date under that section.

For purposes of determining compliance with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 415, as it existed on January 1, 2011, “compensation” is defined as set forth in United States Department of the Treasury Regulation, 26 C.F.R. § 1.415-2(d)(2), as it existed on January 1, 2011.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 17, § 6.

Subchapter 7
— Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan

Effective Dates.

Acts 2013, No. 40, § 18: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1065, § 15, as amended by Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 1: Apr. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 2: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 1065 of 2013 was enacted with an erroneous emergency clause; that the error needs to be rectified as quickly as possible to effect the will of the General Assembly; and that this act is immediately necessary because it will correct and address the error found in the emergency clause of Act 1065 of 2013. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-10-701. Election to participate.

In lieu of terminating employment and accepting a voluntary service retirement benefit, a police officer or firefighter who is a member in paid service with the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System may elect in a manner prescribed by the system to participate in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan under this section and defer the receipt of benefits in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, provided that the member meets one (1) of the following requirements:

The member has at least twenty-eight (28) years of service; or

The member has at least twenty (20) years of service and is at least fifty-five (55) years of age.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall approve the participation in the plan.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1; 2005, No. 871, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 15; 2015, No. 829, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “in a manner prescribed by the system” in (a).

The 2015 amendment, in (a), substituted “voluntary service” for “paid service” and inserted “under § 24-10-701.”

24-10-702. Credited service.

For purposes of this subchapter, “credited service”:

Includes military service credit under § 24-10-502; and

Does not include service credit that is purchased under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

An active member in paid service may use up to thirty-six (36) months of actual volunteer service credit with the system to attain eligibility to participate in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan under § 24-10-701.

In all cases, the accrual of any additional service credit shall not occur upon the enrollment in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan under § 24-10-701.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1; 2015, No. 829, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added the (a) designation; in (a)(2), substituted “Does” for “Shall” and deleted “volunteer service or other credited service that is” preceding “purchased”; and added (b) and (c).

24-10-703. Contributions.

If a member begins participation in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan, the employer and employee contributions shall continue to be paid.

Employer and employee contributions for employees who participate in the plan shall be credited to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

For a member who has at least twenty-eight (28) years of service before electing to participate in the plan, seventy-five percent (75%) of the member's monthly retirement benefit that would have been payable had the member elected to cease employment and receive a service retirement shall be paid into the member's plan account.

For a member who has at least twenty (20) years of service but less than twenty-eight (28) years of service and is at least fifty-five (55) years of age before electing to participate in the plan, seventy-two percent (72%) of the member's monthly retirement benefit that would have been payable had the member elected to cease employment and receive a service retirement shall be paid into the member's plan account.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1; 2005, No. 871, § 2.

24-10-704. Benefits — Rate of return.

The member's monthly retirement benefit shall not change unless the retirement annuity as defined in § 24-10-602 is increased.

A member who participates in this plan shall be credited interest at a rate of six percent (6%) per annum.

The interest shall be credited to the individual account balance of the member on an annual basis.

When a member has reached year six (6) of participation in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan under § 24-10-706, the amount of the benefit calculated at the time of enrollment in the plan shall be redetermined consistent with § 24-10-602.

The redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by three percent (3%).

The redetermined amount shall be payable only when the member elects to cease employment and receive a service retirement and shall not be added to the plan account.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1; 2013, No. 1065, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (c).

24-10-705. Method of payment.

At the option of the participant, the participant in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall receive:

A lump-sum payment from the account equal to the payments into the plan account;

A monthly annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum amount and paid in the form of one (1) of the options for an annuity under § 24-10-603; or

Another method of payment if another method is approved by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1.

24-10-706. Duration.

The duration of participation in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan for active paid service police officers and firefighters shall not exceed seven (7) years.

At the conclusion of a member's participation in the plan, the member shall terminate employment with the employer and shall start receiving the member's monthly retirement benefit that would have been received if the member had retired at the time the member elected to participate in the plan.

At the conclusion of a member's participation in the plan, the member may defer receiving payment of the participant's account and continue with the funds deposited in the plan.

Interest credited under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be calculated in the same manner as § 24-10-704(b), except the interest shall be credited at a rate of two percent (2%) per annum.

The payment of funds accumulated in the plan may be deferred one (1) time.

All funds in the plan shall be distributed in a manner prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System no later than December 31 of the year the participant attains the age of seventy and one-half (70 1/2) years.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1; 2013, No. 1065, § 13; 2017, No. 608, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “seven (7)” for “five (5)” in (a).

The 2017 amendment added (c) and (d).

24-10-707. Death of participant.

If the participant dies during the period of participation in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan, a lump-sum payment equal to the account balance of the participant shall be paid to the participant's survivors or if none, to the participant's estate.

A survivor is entitled to the annuity provided under § 24-10-603 based on the service and final average salary at the time the member elected to participate in the plan.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 16.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “§ 24-10-603” for “§ 24-10-709” in (b).

24-10-708. Disability of participant.

If the participant becomes disabled during the period of participation in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan, the participant shall be treated as any other member who has elected to conclude the other member's participation.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1.

24-10-709. Partial-annuity-and-lump-sum option.

If a member does not terminate employment and retire on the date the member meets the service requirements of § 24-10-604 for an unreduced annuity and was not eligible for or has not elected to participate in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan as provided in this subchapter, the member may elect, in a manner prescribed by the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, at the time of retirement to participate in the partial-annuity-and-lump-sum option under this section.

At the time of retirement, a member electing to participate shall be eligible to receive a lump-sum distribution in an amount not exceeding one (1) month of benefit for each completed month of service beyond eligibility for an unreduced benefit.

The lump sum shall not exceed an amount equal to sixty (60) months of benefits.

The member electing to participate in the partial-annuity-and-lump-sum option shall then have the member's annuity reduced by an amount that is an actuarially determined equivalent of the withdrawal amount.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall adopt rules under this section governing the application for the partial-annuity-and-lump-sum option and the determination of the actuarially equivalent amount of the withdrawal.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1734, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “in a manner prescribed by the system” in (a); and deleted “and regulations” following “adopt rules” in (c).